Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.140

Special reports—Late contributions or large totals—Certain late contributions prohibited. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Treasurers shall prepare and deliver to the commission a special report when a contribution or aggregate of contributions totals one thousand dollars or more, is from a single person or entity, and is received during a special reporting period.

(2) A political committee shall prepare and deliver to the commission a special report when it makes a contribution or an aggregate of contributions to a single entity that totals one thousand dollars or more during a special reporting period.

(3) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions made to or received from a single entity during any one special reporting period. Any subsequent contribution of any size made to or received from the same person or entity during the special reporting period must also be reported.

(4) Special reporting periods, for purposes of this section, include:

(a) The period beginning on the day after the last report required by RCW 29B.25.090 and 29B.25.100 to be filed before a primary and concluding on the end of the day before that primary;

(b) The period 21 days preceding a general election; and

(c) An aggregate of contributions includes only those contributions received from a single entity during any one special reporting period or made by the contributing political committee to a single entity during any one special reporting period.

(5) If a campaign treasurer files a special report under this section for one or more contributions received from a single entity during a special reporting period, the treasurer shall also file a special report under this section for each subsequent contribution of any size which is received from that entity during the special reporting period. If a political committee files a special report under this section for a contribution or contributions made to a single entity during a special reporting period, the political committee shall also file a special report for each subsequent contribution of any size which is made to that entity during the special reporting period.

(6) Special reports required by this section shall be delivered electronically, or in written form if an electronic alternative is not available.

(a) The special report required of a contribution recipient under subsection (1) of this section shall be delivered to the commission within 48 hours of the time, or on the first working day after: The contribution of one thousand dollars or more is received by the candidate or treasurer; the aggregate received by the candidate or treasurer first equals one thousand dollars or more; or any subsequent contribution from the same source is received by the candidate or treasurer.

(b) The special report required of a contributor under subsection (2) of this section or RCW 29B.50.070 shall be delivered to the commission, and the candidate or political committee to whom the contribution or contributions are made, within 24 hours of the time, or on the first working day after: The contribution is made; the aggregate of contributions made first equals one thousand dollars or more; or any subsequent contribution to the same person or entity is made.

(7) The special report shall include:

(a) The amount of the contribution or contributions;

(b) The date or dates of receipt;

(c) The name and address of the donor;

(d) The name and address of the recipient;

(e) A statement that the candidate or political committee has received a certification from any partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons making a contribution reportable under this section that:

(i) The contribution is not financed in any part by a foreign national; and

(ii) Foreign nationals are not involved in making decisions regarding the contribution in any way; and

(f) Any other information the commission may by rule require.

(8) Contributions reported under this section shall also be reported as required by other provisions of this title.

(9) The commission shall prepare daily a summary of the special reports made under this section and RCW 29B.50.070.

(10) Contributions governed by this section include, but are not limited to, contributions made or received indirectly through a third party or entity whether the contributions are or are not reported to the commission as earmarked contributions under RCW 29B.25.150.

[ 2024 c 164 s 431; 2020 c 152 s 7; 2019 c 428 s 24; 2010 c 204 s 414; 2001 c 54 s 2; 1995 c 397 s 4; 1991 c 157 s 1; 1989 c 280 s 11; 1986 c 228 s 2; 1985 c 359 s 1; 1983 c 176 s 1. Formerly RCW 42.17A.265, 42.17.105.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Findings—Local regulations not preempted—2020 c 152: See notes following RCW 29B.40.050.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—2001 c 54: See note following RCW 29B.25.130.

Effective date—1995 c 397: See note following RCW 29B.40.020.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.